fi: Yksityiskohtaiset ainesosat: Akaasia; Açaí; Aloe vera; Eläinproteiini; Arnikki; Artisokka; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Kalsium; Kamomilla; Klorofylli; Kaneli; Kollageeni; Kreatiini; Kurkumiini; Punahatut; Munaproteiini; Pellavansiemen; Fruktooligosakkaridit (FOS); Inkivääri; Ginseng; Vihreä tee; Guarana; Hamppu; Hampunsiemenöljy; Hunaja; Inuliini; Jodi; Rauta; L-karnitiini; L-kysteiini; Glutamiini; L-valiini; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Laventeli; Lesitiini; Magnesium; Mangaani; Mannan-oligosakkaridi (MOS); Matcha; Maitoproteiini; Moringa; Luonnolliset makuaineet; Oliiviöljy; Omega-rasvahapot; Fosfori; Kasvipohjainen proteiini; Kalium; Propolis; Ruusunmarja; Rosmariini; Kuningatarhyytelö; Seleeni; Natrium; Soijaproteiini; Spirulina; Stevia; Tapioka; Tauriini; Hivenaineet; A-vitamiini; B-vitamiini; B1-vitamiini; B12-vitamiini; B2-vitamiini; B3-vitamiini; B5-vitamiini; B6-vitamiini; B7-vitamiini; B9-vitamiini (foolihappo); C-vitamiini; D-vitamiini; D3-vitamiini; E-vitamiini; K-vitamiini; K1-vitamiini; K2-vitamiini; K3-vitamiini; Heraproteiini; Hiiva; Sinkki; Muu
en: Detailed ingredients: Acacia; Acai; Aloe vera; Animal protein; Arnica; Artichoke; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Calcium; Chamomile; Chlorophyll; Cinnamon; Collagen; Creatine; Curcumin; Echinacea; Egg protein; Flaxseed; Fructooligosaccharides (FOS); Ginger; Ginseng; Green tea; Guarana; Hemp; Hemp seed oil; Honey; Inulin; Iodine; Iron; L-carnitine; L-cysteine; L-glutamine; L-valine; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavender; Lecithin; Magnesium; Manganese; Mannan-oligosaccharide (MOS); Matcha; Milk protein; Moringa; Natural flavors; Olive oil; Omega fatty acids; Phosphorus; Plant-based protein; Potassium; Propolis; Rosehip; Rosemary; Royal jelly; Selenium; Sodium; Soy protein; Spirulina; Stevia; Tapioca; Taurine; Trace minerals; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin B1; Vitamin B12; Vitamin B2; Vitamin B3; Vitamin B5; Vitamin B6; Vitamin B7; Vitamin B9 (folic acid); Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin D3; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Vitamin K1; Vitamin K2; Vitamin K3; Whey protein; Yeast; Zinc; Other
nl: Gedetailleerde ingrediënten: Acacia; Acai; Aloe vera; Dierlijk eiwit; Arnica; Artisjok; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Calcium; Kamille; Chlorofyl; Kaneel; Collageen; Creatine; Curcumine; Echinacea; Ei-eiwit; Lijnzaad; Fructo-oligosacchariden (FOS); Gember; Ginseng; Groene thee; Guarana; Hennep; Hennepzaad olie; Honing; Inuline; Jodium; IJzer; L-carnitine; L-cysteïne; L-glutamine; L-valine; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavendel; Sojalecithine; Magnesium; Mangaan; Mannan-oligosaccharide (MOS); Matcha; Melkeiwit; Moringa; Natuurlijke smaakstoffen; Olijfolie; Omega-vetzuren; Fosfor; Plantaardig eiwit; Kalium; Propolis; Rozenbottel; Rozemarijn; Koninklijke gelei; Selenium; Natrium; Soja-eiwit; Spirulina; Stevia; Tapioca; Taurine; Mineralen en sporenelementen; Vitamine A; Vitamine B; Vitamine B1; Vitamine B12; Vitamine B2; Vitamine B3; Vitamine B5; Vitamine B6; Vitamine B7; Vitamine B9 (foliumzuur); Vitamine C; Vitamine D; Vitamine D3; Vitamine E; Vitamine K; Vitamine K1; Vitamine K2; Vitamine K3; Wei-eiwit; Gist; Zink; Andere
es: Ingredientes detallados: Acacia; Acai; Aloe vera; Proteína animal; Árnica; Alcachofa; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Calcio; Manzanilla; Clorofila; Canela; Colágeno; Creatina; Curcumina; Equinácea; Proteína de huevo; Linaza; Fructooligosacáridos (FOS); Jengibre; Ginseng; Té verde; Guaraná; Cáñamo; Aceite de semilla de cáñamo; Miel; Inulina; Yodo; Hierro; L-carnitina; L-cisteína; L-glutamina; L-valina; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavanda; Lecitina; Magnesio; Manganeso; Manano-oligosacárido (MOS); Matcha; Proteína de leche; Moringa; Sabores naturales; Aceite de oliva; Ácidos grasos omega; Fósforo; Proteína de origen vegetal; Potasio; Propóleo; Rosa mosqueta; Romero; Jalea real; Selenio; Sodio; Proteína de soja; Espirulina; Stevia; Tapioca; Taurina; Oligoelementos; Vitamina A; Vitamina B; Vitamina B1; Vitamina B12; Vitamina B2; Vitamina B3; Vitamina B5; Vitamina B6; Vitamina B7; Vitamina B9 (ácido fólico); Vitamina C; Vitamina D; Vitamina D3; Vitamina E; Vitamina K; Vitamina K1; Vitamina K2; Vitamina K3; Proteína de suero; Levadura; Zinc; Otros
th: ส่วนผสมโดยละเอียด: อะคาเซีย; อาซาอิ; ว่านหางจระเข้; โปรตีนจากสัตว์; อาร์นิกา; อาร์ติโชค; บาซิลลัสโคแอกกูแลน; บาซิลลัสซับทิลิส; บิฟิโดแบคทีเรียมบิฟิดุม; CBD; แคลเซียม; ดอกคาโมไมล์; คลอโรฟิลล์; อบเชย; คอลลาเจน; ครีเอทีน; เคอร์คิวมิน; เอคิเนเชีย; โปรตีนจากไข่; เมล็ดแฟลกซ์; ฟรุคโตโอลิโกแซ็กคาไรด์ (FOS); ขิง; โสม; ชาเขียว; กัวรานา; กัญชง; น้ำมันเมล็ดกัญชง; น้ำผึ้ง; อินูลิน; ไอโอดีน; เหล็ก; แอล-คาร์นิทีน; แอล-ซิสเทอีน; แอล-กลูตามีน; แอล-วาลีน; แลคติคาเซอิบาซิลลัส คาเซอิ; แลคติคาเซอิบาซิลลัส รามโนซัส; แลคโตบาซิลลัส แอซิโดฟิลัส; ลาเวนเดอร์; เลซิติน; แมกนีเซียม; แมงกานีส; แมนแนน-โอลิโกแซ็กคาไรด์ (MOS); มัทฉะ; โปรตีนจากนม; มะรุม; สารให้กลิ่นรสจากธรรมชาติ; น้ำมันมะกอก; กรดไขมันโอเมก้า; ฟอสฟอรัส; โปรตีนจากพืช; โพแทสเซียม; กาวผึ้ง; โรสฮิป; โรสแมรี; นมผึ้ง; ซีลีเนียม; โซเดียม; โปรตีนจากถั่วเหลือง; สไปรูรินา; หญ้าหวาน; มันสำปะหลัง; ทอรีน; แร่ธาตุรอง; วิตามินเอ; วิตามินบี; วิตามินบี 1; วิตามินบี 12; วิตามินบี 2; วิตามินบี 3; วิตามินบี 5; วิตามินบี 6; วิตามินบี 7; วิตามินบี 9 (กรดโฟลิก); วิตามินซี; วิตามินดี; วิตามินดี 3; วิตามินอี; วิตามินเค; วิตามินเค 1; วิตามินเค 2; วิตามินเค 3; เวย์โปรตีน; ยีสต์; สังกะสี; อื่นๆ
cs: Podrobný seznam ingrediencí: Akácie; Acai; Aloe pravá; Živočišný protein; Arnika; Artyčok; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Vápník; Heřmánek; Chlorofyl; Skořice; Kolagen; Kreatin; Kurkumin; Echinacea; Vaječný protein; Lněné semínko; Fruktooligosacharidy (FOS); Zázvor; Ženšen; Zelený čaj; Guarana; Konopí; Olej z konopných semínek; Med; inulin; Jód; Železo; L-karnitin; L-cystein; L-glutamin; L-valin; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Levandule; Lecitin; Hořčík; Mangan; Mannan-oligosacharid (MOS); Matcha; Mléčný protein; Moringa; Přírodní příchutě; Olivový olej; Omega mastné kyseliny; Fosfor; Rostlinný protein; Draslík; Propolis; Šípky; Rozmarýn; Mateří kašička; Selen; Sodík; Sojový protein; Spirulina; Stévie; Tapioka; Taurin; Stopové minerály; Vitamín A; Vitamín B; Vitamín B1; Vitamín B12; Vitamín B2; Vitamín B3; Vitamín B5; Vitamín B6; Vitamín B7; Vitamín B9 (kyselina listová); Vitamín C; Vitamín D; Vitamín D3; Vitamín E; Vitamín K; Vitamín K1; Vitamín K2; Vitamín K3; Syrovátkový protein; Droždí; Zinek; Jiné
da: Detaljerede ingredienser: Acacia; Acai; Aloe vera; Animalsk protein; Arnica; Artiskok; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Calcium; Kamille; Klorofyl; Kanel; Kollagen; Kreatin; Curcumin; Echinacea; Æggeprotein; Hørfrø; Fruktooligosaccharider (FOS); Ingefær; Ginseng; Grøn te; Guarana; Hamp; Hampefrøolie; Honning; Inulin; Jod; Jern; L-carnitin; L-cystein; L-glutamin; L-valin; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavendel; Lecithin; Magnesium; Mangan; Mannan-oligosaccharide (MOS); Matcha; Mælkeprotein; Moringa; Naturlige smagsstoffer; Olivenolie; Omega-fedtsyrer; Fosfor; Plantebaseret protein; Kalium; Propolis; Hyben; Rosmarin; Royal gelé; Selen; Natrium; Sojaprotein; Spirulina; Stevia; Tapioka; Taurin; Spormineraler; A-vitamin; B-vitamin; B1-vitamin; B12-vitamin; B2-vitamin; B3-vitamin; B5-vitamin; B6-vitamin; B7-vitamin; B9-vitamin (folinsyre); C-vitamin; D-vitamin; D3-vitamin; E-vitamin; K-vitamin; K1-vitamin; K2-vitamin; K3-vitamin; Valleprotein; Gær; Zink; Andet
de: Detaillierte Inhaltsstoffe: Akazie; Acai; Aloe vera; Tierisches Protein; Arnica; Artischocke; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Kalzium; Kamille; Chlorophyll; Zimt; Kollagen; Kreatin; Kurkumin; Sonnenhut; Eiprotein; Leinsamen; Oligofructose (FOS); Ingwer; Ginseng; Grüner Tee; Guarana; Hanf; Hanföl; Honig; Inulin; Jod; Eisen; L-Carnitine; L-Cystein; L-Glutamin; L-Valin; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavendel; Lecithin; Magnesium; Mangan; Mannan-Oligosaccharide (MOS); Matcha; Milcheiweiß; Moringa; Natürliche Aromen; Olivenöl; Omega-Fettsäuren; Phosphor; Pflanzliches Protein; Kalium; Propolis; Hagebutte; Rosmarin; Gelée royale; Selen; Natrium; Sojaprotein; Spirulina; Stevia; Tapioka; Taurin; Spurenelemente; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin B1; Vitamin B12; Vitamin B2; Vitamin B3; Vitamin B5; Vitamin B6; Vitamin B7; Vitamin B9 (Folsäure); Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin D3; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Vitamin K1; Vitamin K2; Vitamin K3; Molkenprotein; Hefe; Zink; Sonstiges
vi: Thành phần chi tiết: Cây keo; Quả acai; Nha đam; Protein động vật; Cúc arnica; Atisô; Bacillus coagulans; Trực khuẩn subtilis; Bifidobacteria bifidum; CBD; Canxi; Cúc La Mã; Diệp lục; Quế; Collagen; Creatine; Curcumin; Hoa cúc tím; Protein trứng; Hạt lanh; Fructooligosaccharides (FOS); Gừng; Nhân sâm; Trà xanh; Guarana; Cây gai dầu; Dầu hạt cây gai dầu; Mật ong; Inulin; Iốt; Sắt; L-carnitine; L-cysteine; L-glutamine; L-valine; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Hoa oải hương; Lecithin; Magiê; Mangan; Mannan-oligosaccharide (MOS); Trà xanh; Đạm sữa; Chùm ngây; Hương vị tự nhiên; Dầu ô liu; Axit béo omega; Phốt pho; Protein thực vật; Kali; Keo ong; Tầm xuân; Hương thảo; Sữa ong chúa; Selen; Natri; Protein đậu nành; Tảo xoắn; Cỏ ngọt; Bột năng; Taurine; Khoáng vi lượng; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin B1; Vitamin B12; Vitamin B2; Vitamin B3; Vitamin B5; Vitamin B6; Vitamin B7; Vitamin B9 (axit folic); Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin D3; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Vitamin K1; Vitamin K2; Vitamin K3; Đạm váng sữa; Men bia; Kẽm; Khác
ko: 세부 성분: 아카시아; 아사이; 알로에 베라; 동물성 단백질; 아르니카; 아티초크; 바실러스 코아귤런스; 고초균; 비피도박테리움 비피덤; CBD; 칼슘; 캐모마일; 엽록소; 시나몬; 콜라겐; 크레아틴; 커큐민; 에키네시아; 계란 단백질; 아마씨; 프락토올리고당(FOS); 생강; 인삼; 녹차; 과라나; 대마; 삼씨오일; 꿀; 이눌린; 아이오딘; 철; L-카르니틴; L-시스테인; L-글루타민; L-발린; 락티카세이바실러스 카세이; 락티카세이바실러스 람노서스; 락토바실러스 아시도필루스; 라벤더; 레시틴; 마그네슘; 망가니즈; 만난올리고당(MOS); 말차; 우유 단백질; 모링가; 천연 향료; 올리브유; 오메가 지방산; 인; 식물성 단백질; 포타슘; 프로폴리스; 로즈힙; 로즈마리; 로열 젤리; 셀레늄; 소듐; 대두 단백질; 스피룰리나; 스테비아; 타피오카; 타우린; 미량 미네랄; 비타민 A; 비타민 B; 비타민 B1; 비타민 B12; 비타민 B2; 비타민 B3; 비타민 B5; 비타민 B6; 비타민 B7; 비타민 B9(엽산); 비타민 C; 비타민 D; 비타민 D3; 비타민 E; 비타민 K; 비타민 K1; 비타민 K2; 비타민 K3; 유청 단백질; 이스트; 아연; 기타
sl-SI: Podrobne sestavine: Akacija; Acai; Aloe vera; Živalske beljakovine; Arnika; Artičoka; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Kalcij; Kamilica; Klorofil; Cimet; Kolagen; Kreatin; Kurkumin; Echinacea; Jajčne beljakovine; Laneno seme; Fruktooligosaharidi (FOS); Ingver; Ginseng; Zeleni čaj; Guarana; Konoplja; Konopljino olje; Med; Inulin; Jod; Železo; L-karnitin; L-cistein; L-glutamin; L-valin; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Sivka; Lecitin; Magnezij; Mangan; Manan-oligosaharid (MOS); Matcha; Mlečne beljakovine; Moringa; Naravne arome; Olivno olje; Omega-6 maščobne kisline; Fosfor; Beljakovine rastlinskega izvora; Kalij; Propolis; Šipek; Rožmarin; Matični mleček; Selen; Natrij; Sojine beljakovine; Spirulina; Stevia; Tapioka; Taurin; Minerali v sledovih; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin B1; Vitamin B12; Vitamin B2; Vitamin B3; Vitamin B5; Vitamin B6; Vitamin B7; Vitamin B9 (folna kislina); Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin D3; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Vitamin K1; Vitamin K2; Vitamin K3; Sirotkine beljakovine; Kvas; Cink; Drugo
ja: 詳細成分: アカシア; アサイー; アロエベラ; 動物性タンパク質; アルニカ; アーティチョーク; 有胞子性乳酸菌; 枯草菌; ビフィズス菌ビフィダム; CBD; カルシウム; カモミール; クロロフィル; シナモン; コラーゲン; クレアチン; クルクミン; エキナセア; 卵タンパク質; 亜麻仁; フラクトオリゴ糖 (FOS); ショウガ; 高麗人参; グリーンティー; ガラナ; 麻; ヘンプシードオイル; はちみつ; イヌリン; ヨウ素; 鉄; L-カルニチン; L-システイン; L-グルタミン; L-バリン; ラクチカゼイバチルスカゼイ; ラクトバチルスラムノサス; ラクトバチルスアシドフィルス; ラベンダー; レシチン; マグネシウム; マンガン; マンナンオリゴ糖 (MOS); 抹茶; 乳タンパク質; モリンガ; 天然フレーバー; オリーブオイル; オメガ脂肪酸; リン; 植物性タンパク質; カリウム; プロポリス; ローズヒップ; ローズマリー; ローヤルゼリー; セレン; ナトリウム; 大豆プロテイン; スピルリナ; ステビア; タピオカ; タウリン; 微量ミネラル; ビタミンA; ビタミンB; ビタミンB1; ビタミンB12; ビタミンB2; ビタミンB3; ビタミンB5; ビタミンB6; ビタミンB7; ビタミンB9 (葉酸); ビタミンC; ビタミンD; ビタミンD3; ビタミンE; ビタミンK; ビタミンK1; ビタミンK2; ビタミンK3; ホエイプロテイン; イースト; 亜鉛; その他
bg-BG: Подробни съставки: Акация; Акай; Алое вера; Животински протеин; Арника; Артишок; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Калций; Лайка; Хлорофил; Канела; Колаген; Креатин; Куркумин; Ехинацея; Яйчен протеин; Ленено семе; Фруктоолигозахариди (FOS); Джинджифил; Женшен; Зелен чай; Гуарана; Коноп; Масло от конопено семе; Мед; Инулин; Йод; Желязо; L-карнитин; L-цистеин; L-глутамин; L-валин; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Лавандула; Лецитин; Магнезий; Манган; Манан-олигозахарид (MOS); Матча; Млечен протеин; Моринга; Естествени аромати; Зехтин; Омега мастни киселини; Фосфор; Протеин на растителна основа; Калий; Прополис; Шипка; Розмарин; Пчелно млечице; Селен; Натрий; Соев протеин; Спирулина; Стевия; Тапиока; Таурин; Микроелементи; Витамин А; Витамин В; Витамин В1; Витамин В12; Витамин B2; Витамин В3; Витамин В5; Витамин В6; Витамин В7; Витамин В9 (фолиева киселина); Витамин С; Витамин D; Витамин D3; Витамин Е; Витамин К; Витамин К1; Витамин К2; Витамин К3; Суроватъчен протеин; Мая; Цинк; Други
fr: Ingrédients détaillés: Acacia; Açaï; Aloe vera; Protéine animale; Arnica; Artichaut; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Calcium; Camomille; Chlorophylle; Cannelle; Collagène; Créatine; Curcumine; Échinacée; Protéine d'œuf; Graine de lin; Fructo-oligosaccharides (FOS); Gingembre; Ginseng; Thé vert; Guarana; Chanvre; Huile de graines de chanvre; Miel; Inuline; Iode; Fer; L-carnitine; L-cystéine; L-glutamine; L-valine; Lactobacillus casei; Lactobacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavande; Lécithine; Magnésium; Manganèse; Mannan-oligosaccharide (MOS); Matcha; Protéine de lait; Moringa; Arômes naturels; Huile d’olive; Acides gras oméga; Phosphore; Protéine végétale; Potassium; Propolis; Églantine; Romarin; Gelée royale; Sélénium; Sodium; Protéine de soja; Spiruline; Stévia; Tapioca; Taurine; Oligo-éléments; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin B1; Vitamin B12; Vitamin B2; Vitamin B3; Vitamin B5; Vitamin B6; Vitamin B7; Vitamine B9 (acide folique); Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin D3; Vitamine E; Vitamin K; Vitamin K1; Vitamin K2; Vitamin K3; Protéine de lactosérum; Levure; Zinc; Autre
nb: Detaljerte ingredienser: Akasie; Acai; Aloe vera; Animalsk protein; Arnica; Artisjokk; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Kalsium; Kamille; Klorofyll; Kanel; Kollagen; Kreatin; Curcumin; Echinacea; Eggeprotein; Linfrø; Fruktooligosakkarider (FOS); Ingefær; Ginseng; Grønn te; Guarana; Hamp; Hampfrøolje; Honning; Inulin; Jod; Jern; L-carnitin; L-cystein; L-glutamin; L-valin; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavendel; Lecitin; Magnesium; Mangan; Mannan-oligosakkarid (MOS); Matcha; Melkeprotein; Moringa; Naturlige smaker; Olivenolje; Omegafettsyrer; Fosfor; Plantebasert protein; Kalium; Propolis; Nype; Rosmarin; Dronninggelé; Selen; Natrium; Soyaprotein; Spirulina; Stevia; Tapioca; Taurin; Spormineraler; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin B1; Vitamin B12; Vitamin B2; Vitamin B3; Vitamin B5; Vitamin B6; Vitamin B7; Vitamin B9 (folsyre); Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin D3; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Vitamin K1; Vitamin K2; Vitamin K3; Myseprotein; Gjær; Sink; Annen
zh-CN: 详细成分: 阿拉伯树胶; 巴西莓; 芦荟; 动物蛋白; 山金车; 朝鲜蓟; 凝结芽孢杆菌; 枯草杆菌; 双裂双岐杆菌; 大麻二酚; 钙; 洋甘菊; 叶绿素; 肉桂; 胶原; 肌酸; 姜黄素; 紫锥花; 卵蛋白; 亚麻籽; 低聚果糖 (FOS); 姜; 人参; 绿茶; 瓜拉那; 麻; 大麻籽油; 蜂蜜; 菊粉; 碘; 铁; 左旋肉碱; 左旋半胱氨酸; 左旋谷酰胺; 左旋缬氨酸; 干酪乳杆菌; 鼠李糖乳杆菌; 嗜酸乳杆菌; 薰衣草; 卵磷脂; 镁; 锰; 甘露寡糖 (MOS); 抹茶; 牛奶蛋白; 辣木; 天然香料; 橄榄油; 欧米伽脂肪酸; 磷; 植物蛋白; 钾; 蜂胶; 玫瑰果籽; 迷迭香; 蜂王浆; 硒; 钠; 大豆蛋白; 螺旋藻; 甜叶菊; 木薯淀粉; 牛磺酸; 微量元素; 维生素 A; 维生素 B; 维生素 B1; 维生素 B12; 维生素 B2; 维生素 B3; 维生素 B5; 维生素 B6; 维生素 B7; 维生素 B9（叶酸）; 维生素 C; 维生素 D; 维生素 D3; 维生素 E; 维生素 K; 维生素 K1; 维生素 K2; 维生素 K3; 乳清蛋白; 酵母; 锌; 其他
tr: Detaylı Malzemeler: Akasya; Açai; Aloe vera; Hayvansal protein; Arnika; Enginar; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Kalsiyum; Papatya; Klorofil; Tarçın; Kollajen; Kreatin; Kurkumin; Ekinezya; Yumurta proteini; Keten tohumu; Fruktooligosakkaritler (FOS); Zencefil; Ginseng; Yeşil çay; Guarana; Kenevir; Kenevir tohumu yağı; Bal; İnülin; İyot; Demir; L-karnitin; L-sistein; L-glutamin; L-valin; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavanta; Lesitin; Magnezyum; Manganez; Mannan-oligosakkarit (MOS); Matcha; Süt proteini; Moringa; Doğal tatlar; Zeytin yağı; Omega yağ asitleri; Fosfor; Bitki bazlı protein; Potasyum; Propolis; Kuşburnu; Biberiye; Arı sütü; Selenyum; Sodyum; Soya proteini; Spirulina; Stevia; Tapyoka; Taurin; İz mineralleri; A vitamini; B vitamini; B1 Vitamini; B12 vitamini; B2 Vitamini; B3 Vitamini; B5 Vitamini; B6 Vitamini; B7 Vitamini; B9 Vitamini (folik asit); C Vitamini; D vitamini; D3 Vitamini; E vitamini; K vitamini; K1 Vitamini; K2 Vitamini; K3 Vitamini; Peynir altı suyu proteini; Maya; Çinko; Diğer
lt-LT: Išsami sudėtis: Akacija; Acai; Alijošius; Gyvulinės kilmės baltymai; Arnika; Artišokas; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; Kanabinoidai; Kalcis; Ramunėlės; Chlorofilas; Cinamonas; Kolagenas; Kreatinas; Kurkuminas; Ežiuolė; Kiaušinių baltymai; Linų sėmenys; Fruktooligosacharidai (FOS); Imbieras; Ženšenis; Žalioji arbata; Guarana; Kanapių pluoštas; Kanapių sėklų aliejus; Medus; Inulinas; Jodas; „Iron“ (tiesių smūgių); L-karnitinas; L-cisteinas; L-glutaminas; L-valinas; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Levandos; Lecitinas; Magnis; Manganas; Manano oligosacharidas (MOS); Mača; Pieno baltymai; Moringa; Natūralūs skoniai; Alyvuogių aliejus; Omega riebalų rūgštys; Fosforas; Augalinės kilmės baltymai; Kalis; Propolis; Erškėtuogė; Rozmarinas; Bičių pienelis; Selenas; Natris; Sojų baltymai; Spirulina; Stevija; Tapijoka; Taurinas; Mikromineralai; Vitaminas A; Vitaminas B; Vitaminas B1; Vitaminas B12; Vitaminas B2; Vitaminas B3; Vitaminas B5; Vitaminas B6; Vitaminas B7; Vitaminas B9 (folio rūgštis); Vitaminas C; Vitaminas D; Vitaminas D3; Vitaminas E; Vitaminas K; Vitaminas K1; Vitaminas K2; Vitaminas K3; Išrūgų baltymai; Mielės; Cinkas; Kita
ru: Подробный состав: Акация; Асаи; Алоэ вера; Животный белок; Арника; Артишок; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Кальций; Ромашка; Хлорофилл; Корица; Коллаген; Креатин; Куркумин; Эхинацея; Яичный белок; Льняное семя; Фруктоолигосахариды (ФОС); Имбирь; Женьшень; Зеленый чай; Гуарана; Конопля; Конопляное масло; Мед; Инулин; Йод; Железо; L-карнитин; L-цистеин; L-глютамин; L-валин; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Лаванда; Лецитин; Магний; Марганец; Маннан-олигосахарид (МОС); Матча; Молочный белок; Моринга; Натуральные ароматизаторы; Оливковое масло; Омега-3 жирные кислоты; Фосфор; Растительный белок; Калий; Прополис; Шиповник; Розмарин; Маточное молочко; Селен; Натрий; Соевый белок; Спирулина; Стевия; Тапиока; Таурин; Микроэлементы; Витамин А; Витамин B; Витамин B1; Витамин B12; Витамин B2; Витамин B3; Витамин B5; Витамин B6; Витамин B7; Витамин B9 (фолиевая кислота); Витамин С; Витамин D; Витамин D3; Витамин Е; Витамин K; Витамин K1; Витамин K2; Витамин K3; Белок молочной сыворотки; Дрожжи; Цинк; Другое
el: Αναλυτικά συστατικά: Ακακία; Ακάι; Αλόη βέρα; Ζωική πρωτεΐνη; Αρνάκις; Αγκινάρα; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Ασβέστιο; Χαμομήλι; Χλωροφύλλη; Κανέλα; Κολλαγόνο; Κρεατίνη; Κουρκουμίνη; Εχινάκεια; Πρωτεΐνη αυγού; Λιναρόσπορος; Φρουκτοολιγοσακχαρίτες (FOS); Τζίντζερ; Τζίνσενγκ; Πράσινο τσάι; Γκουαράνα; Καννάβι; Έλαιο σπόρων κάνναβης; Μέλι; Ινουλίνη; Ιώδιο; Σίδερο; L-καρνιτίνη; L-κυστεΐνη; L-γλουταμίνη; L-βαλίνη; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Λεβάντα; Λεκιθίνη; Μαγνήσιο; Μαγγάνιο; Μαννάνη-ολιγοσακχαρίτης (MOS); Μάτσα; Πρωτεΐνη γάλακτος; Μορίνγκα; Φυσικές αρωματικές ύλες; Ελαιόλαδο; Ωμέγα λιπαρά οξέα; Φώσφορος; Πρωτεΐνη φυτικής προέλευσης; Κάλιο; Πρόπολη; Κυνόροδο; Δεντρολίβανο; Βασιλικός πολτός; Σελήνιο; Νάτριο; Πρωτεΐνη σόγιας; Σπιρουλίνα; Στέβια; Ταπιόκα; Ταυρίνη; Ιχνοστοιχεία; Βιταμίνη Α; Βιταμίνη Β; Βιταμίνη Β1; Βιταμίνη Β12; Βιταμίνη Β2; Βιταμίνη Β3; Βιταμίνη Β5; Βιταμίνη Β6; Βιταμίνη Β7; Βιταμίνη Β9 (φολικό οξύ); Βιταμίνη C; Βιταμίνη D; Βιταμίνη D3; Βιταμίνη Ε; Βιταμίνη Κ; Βιταμίνη Κ1; Βιταμίνη Κ2; Βιταμίνη Κ3; Πρωτεΐνη ορού γάλακτος; Μαγιά; Τσίγκος; Άλλο
pt-BR: Ingredientes detalhados: Acácia; Açaí; Aloe vera; Proteína animal; Arnica; Alcachofra; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Cálcio; Camomila; Clorofila; Canela; Colágeno; Creatina; Curcumina; Echinacea; Proteína do ovo; Linhaça; Fruto-oligossacarídeos (FOS); Gengibre; Ginseng; Chá verde; Guaraná; Cânhamo; Óleo de sementes de cânhamo; Mel; Inulina; Iodo; Ferro; L-carnitina; L-cisteína; L-glutamina; L-valina; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavanda; Lecitina; Magnésio; Manganês; Mananoligossacarídeo (MOS); Matcha; Proteína de leite; Moringa; Aromas naturais; Azeite de oliva; Ácidos graxos ômega; Fósforo; Proteína vegetal; Potássio; Própolis; Rosa mosqueta; Alecrim; Geleia real; Selênio; Sódio; Proteína de soja; Espirulina; Estévia; Tapioca; Taurina; Microminerais; Vitamina A; Vitamina B; Vitamina B1; Vitamina B12; Vitamina B2; Vitamina B3; Vitamina B5; Vitamina B6; Vitamina B7; Vitamina B9 (ácido fólico); Vitamina C; Vitamina D; Vitamina D3; Vitamina E; Vitamina K; Vitamina K1; Vitamina K2; Vitamina K3; Whey protein; Fermento; Zinco; Outro
sv: Detaljerade ingredienser: Akacia; Acai; Aloe vera; Animaliskt protein; Arnica; Kronärtskocka; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Kalcium; Kamomill; Klorofyll; Kanel; Kollagen; Kreatin; Curcumin; Echinacea; Äggprotein; Linfrö; Fruktooligosackarider (FOS); Ingefära; Ginseng; Grönt te; Guarana; Hampa; Hampafröolja; Honung; Inulin; Jod; Järn; L-karnitin; L-cystein; L-glutamin; L-valin; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavender; Sojalecitin; Magnesium; Mangan; Mannan-oligosackarid (MOS); Matcha; Mjölkprotein; Moringa; Naturliga smakämnen; Olivolja; Omegafettsyror; Fosfor; Växtbaserat protein; Kalium; Propolis; Nyponolja; Rosmarin; Royal gelé; Selen; Natrium; Sojaprotein; Spirulina; Stevia; Tapioka; Taurin; Spåra mineraler; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin B1; Vitamin B12; Vitamin B2; Vitamin B3; Vitamin B5; Vitamin B6; Vitamin B7; Vitamin B9 (folsyra); Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin D3; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Vitamin K1; Vitamin K2; Vitamin K3; Vassleprotein; Jäst; Zink; Annat
sk-SK: Podrobné zložky: Akácia; Acai; Aloe vera; Živočíšna bielkovina; Arnika; Artičok; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Vápnik; Harmanček; Chlorofyl; Škorica; Kolagén; Kreatín; Kurkumín; Echinacea; Vaječná bielkovina; Ľanové semienko; Fruktooligosacharidy (FOS); Zázvor; Ženšen; Zelený čaj; Guarana; Konope; Olej z konopných semien; Med; Inulín; Jód; Železo; L-karnitín; L-cysteín; L-glutamín; L-valín; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Levanduľa; Lecitín; Magnézium; Mangán; Mannan-oligosacharid (MOS); Matcha; Mliečna bielkovina; Moringa; Prírodné príchute; Olivový olej; Omega mastné kyseliny; Fosfor; Rastlinná bielkovina; Draslík; Propolis; Šípka; Rozmarín; Materská kašička; Selén; Sodík; Sójový proteín; Spirulina; Stévia; Tapioca; Taurín; Stopové minerály; Vitamín A; Vitamín B; Vitamin B1; Vitamin B12; Vitamin B2; Vitamin B3; Vitamin B5; Vitamin B6; Vitamin B7; Vitamín B9 (kyselina listová); Vitamín C; Vitamín D; Vitamin D3; Vitamín E; Vitamín K; Vitamin K1; Vitamin K2; Vitamin K3; Srvátkový proteín; Kvasnice; Zinok; Iné
pl: Składniki szczegółowe: Akacja; Euterpa warzywna; Aloes zwyczajny; Białko zwierzęce; Arnika; Karczochy; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Wapń; Rumianek rzymski; Chlorofil; Cynamon; Kolagen; Kreatyna; Kurkumina; Echinacea; Białka jaja; Siemię lniane; Fruktooligosacharydy (FOS); Imbir; Żeń-szeń; Herbata zielona; Guarana; Konopie; Olej z nasion konopi; Miód; Inulina; Jod; Żelazo; L-karnityna; L-cysteina; L-glutamina; L-walina; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lawenda; Lecytyna; Magnez; Mangan; Mannan-oligosacharyd (MOS); Matcha; Białko mleka; Moringa; Aromaty naturalne; Oliwa z oliwek; Kwasy tłuszczowe omega; Fosfor; Białko roślinne; Potas; Kit pszczeli; Owoce dzikiej roży; Rozmaryn; Mleczko pszczele; Selen; Sód; Białko sojowe; Spirulina; Stewia; Tapioka; Tauryna; Pierwiastki śladowe; Witamina A; Witamina B; Witamina B1; Witamina B12; Witamina B2; Witamina B3; Witamina B5; Witamina B6; Witamina B7; Witamina B9 (kwas foliowy); Witamina C; Witamina D; Witamina D3; Witamina E; Witamina K; Witamina K1; Witamina K2; Witamina K3; Białko serwatki; Drożdże; Cynk; Pozostałe
hr-HR: Detaljni popis sastojaka: Akacija; Acai; Aloja; Bjelančevine životinjskog podrijetla; Arnika; Artičoka; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Kalcij; Kamilica; Klorofil; Cimet; Kolagen; Kreatin; Kurkumin; Ehinaceja; Bjelančevine iz jaja; Lanene sjemenke; Fruktooligosaharidi (FOS); Đumbir; Ginseng; Zeleni čaj; Guarana; Konoplja; Ulje sjemenki konoplje; Med; Inulin; Jod; Željezo; L-karnitin; L-cistein; L-glutamin; L-valin; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavanda; Lecitin; Magnezij; Mangan; Manan-oligosaharid (MOS); Matcha; Bjelančevine iz mlijeka; Moringa; Prirodni okusi; Maslinovo ulje; Omega masne kiseline; Fosfor; Bjelančevine biljnog podrijetla; Kalij; Propolis; Šipak; Ružmarin; Matična mliječ; Selen; Natrij; Bjelančevine iz soje; Spirulina; Stevia; Tapioka; Taurin; Minerali u tragovima; Vitamin A; Vitamin B; Vitamin B1; Vitamin B12; Vitamin B2; Vitamin B3; Vitamin B5; Vitamin B6; Vitamin B7; Vitamin B9 (folna kiselina); Vitamin C; Vitamin D; Vitamin D3; Vitamin E; Vitamin K; Vitamin K1; Vitamin K2; Vitamin K3; Bjelančevine iz sirutke; Kvasac; Cink; Ostalo
zh-TW: 詳細成分: 相思樹屬; 巴西苺; 蘆薈; 動物性蛋白質; 山金車; 朝鮮薊; 凝結芽孢桿菌; 枯草桿菌; 兩歧雙歧桿菌; 大麻二酚 (CBD); 鈣; 洋甘菊; 葉綠素; 肉桂; 膠原; 肌酸; 薑黃素; 紫錐花; 雞蛋蛋白; 亞麻籽; 低聚果糖（FOS）; 薑; 人參; 綠茶; 瓜拿納; 大麻; 大麻籽油; 蜂蜜; 菊粉; 碘; 鐵; 左旋肉鹼; 左旋半胱氨酸; 左旋麩醯胺酸; 左旋纈氨酸; 乾酪乳桿菌; 鼠李糖乳酸桿菌; 嗜酸乳桿菌; 薰衣草; 卵磷脂; 鎂; 錳; 甘露寡糖（MOS）; 抹茶; 牛奶蛋白; 辣木; 天然香料; 橄欖油; Omega 脂肪酸; 磷; 植物性蛋白質; 鉀; 蜂膠; 玫瑰果實; 迷迭香; 蜂王乳; 硒; 鈉; 大豆蛋白; 螺旋藻; 甜菊; 木薯; 牛磺酸; 微量礦物質; 維生素 A; 維生素 B; 維生素 B1; 維生素 B12; 維生素 B2; 維生素 B3; 維生素 B5; 維生素 B6; 維生素 B7; 維生素 B9（葉酸）; 維生素 C; 維生素 D; 維生素 D3; 維生素 E; 維生素 K; 維生素 K1; 維生素 K2; 維生素 K3; 乳清蛋白; 酵母; 鋅; 其他
pt-PT: Ingredientes detalhados: Acácia; Açaí; Aloé vera; Proteína animal; Arnica; Alcachofra; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Cálcio; Camomila; Clorofila; Canela; Colagénio; Creatina; Curcumina; Flor-de-cone; Proteína de ovo; Linhaça; Fruto-oligossacarídeo (FOS); Gengibre; Ginseng; Chá verde; Guaraná; Cânhamo; Óleo de grainha de uva; Mel; Inulina; Iodo; Ferro; L-carnitina; L-cisteína; L-glutamina; L-valina; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavanda; Lecitina; Magnésio; Manganês; Mannan-oligosaccharide (MOS); Matcha; Proteína de leite; Moringa; Aromas naturais; Azeite; Ácidos gordos ómega; Fósforo; Proteína vegetal; Potássio; Própolis; Cinórrodos; Alecrim; Geleia real; Selénio; Sódio; Proteína de soja; Espirulina; Estévia; Tapioca; Taurina; Oligoelementos minerais; Vitamina A; Vitamina B; Vitamina B1; Vitamina B12; Vitamina B2; Vitamina B3; Vitamina B5; Vitamina B6; Vitamina B7; Vitamina B9 (ácido fólico); Vitamina C; Vitamina D; Vitamina D3; Vitamina E; Vitamina K; Vitamina K1; Vitamina K2; Vitamina K3; Proteína de soro de leite coalhado; Fermento; Zinco; Outro
it: Ingredienti nel dettaglio: Acacia; Acai; Aloe vera; Proteine animali; Arnica; Carciofo; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Calcio; Camomilla; Clorofilla; Cannella; Collagene; Creatina; Curcumina; Echinacea; Proteine dell'uovo; Semi di lino; Frutto-oligosaccaridi (FOS); Zenzero; Ginseng; Tè verde; Guaranà; Canapa; Olio di semi di canapa; Miele; Inulina; Iodio; Ferro; L-carnitina; L-cisteina; L-glutammina; L-valina; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lattobacillo acidofilo; Lavanda; Lecitina; Magnesio; Manganese; Mannano-oligosaccaride (MOS); Matcha; Proteine del latte; Moringa; Aromi naturali; Olio d'oliva; Acidi grassi Omega; Fosforo; Proteine vegetali; Potassio; Propoli; Falso frutto della rosa; Rosmarino; Pappa reale; Selenio; Sodio; Proteine della soia; Spirulina; Stevia; Tapioca; Taurina; Minerali traccia; Vitamina A; Vitamina B; Vitamina B1; Vitamina B12; Vitamina B2; Vitamina B3; Vitamina B5; Vitamina B6; Vitamina B7; Vitamina B9 (acido folico); Vitamina C; Vitamina D; Vitamina D3; Vitamina E; Vitamina K; Vitamina K1; Vitamina K2; Vitamina K3; Proteine del siero del latte; Lievito; Zinco; Altro
hu: Részletes összetevők: Akác; Acai; Aloe vera; Állati fehérje; Árnika; Articsóka; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Kalcium; Kamilla; Klorofill; Fahéj; Kollagén; Kreatin; Kurkumin; Echinacea; Tojásfehérje; Lenmag; Fruktooligoszacharidok (FOS); Gyömbér; Ginzeng; Zöld tea; Guarana; Kender; Kendermagolaj; Méz; Inulin; Jód; Vas; L-karnitin; L-cisztein; L-glutamin; L-valin; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Levendula; Lecitin; Magnézium; Mangán; Mannan-oligoszacharid (MOS); Matcha; Tejfehérje; Moringa; Természetes aromák; Olívaolaj; Omega-zsírsavak; Foszfor; Növényi alapú fehérje; Kálium; Propolisz; Csipkebogyó; Rozmaring; Méhpempő; Szelén; Nátrium; Szójafehérje; Spirulina; Sztívia; Tápióka; Taurin; Nyomelemek; A-vitamin; B-vitamin; B1-vitamin; B12-vitamin; B2-vitamin; B3-vitamin; B5-vitamin; B6-vitamin; B7-vitamin; B9-vitamin (folsav); C-vitamin; D-vitamin; D3-vitamin; E-vitamin; K-vitamin; K1-vitamin; K2-vitamin; K3-vitamin; Tejsavófehérje; Élesztő; Cink; Egyéb
ro-RO: Ingrediente detaliate: Acacia; Acai; Aloe vera; Proteine animale; Arnică; Anghinare; Bacillus coagulans; Bacillus subtilis; Bifidobacterium bifidum; CBD; Calciu; Mușețel; Clorofilă; Scorțișoară; Colagen; Creatină; Curcumină; Echinacea; Proteine din ouă; Semințe de in; Fructooligozaharide (FOS); Ghimbir; Ginseng; Ceai verde; Guarana; Cânepă; Ulei din semințe de cânepă; Miere; Inulină; Iod; Iron; L-carnitină; L-cisteină; L-glutamină; L-valină; Lacticaseibacillus casei; Lacticaseibacillus rhamnosus; Lactobacillus acidophilus; Lavandă; Lecitină; Magneziu; Mangan; Manan-oligozaharide (MOS); Matcha; Proteine din lapte; Moringa; Arome naturale; Ulei de măsline; Acizi grași Omega; Fosfor; Proteine pe bază de plante; Potasiu; Propolis; Măceș; Rozmarin; Lăptișor de matcă; Seleniu; Sodiu; Proteine din soia; Spirulină; Stevia; Tapioca; Taurină; Urme de minerale; Vitamina A; Vitamina B; Vitamin B1; Vitamin B12; Vitamin B2; Vitamin B3; Vitamin B5; Vitamin B6; Vitamin B7; Vitamina B9 (acid folic); Vitamina C; Vitamin D; Vitamin D3; Vitamina E; Vitamina K; Vitamin K1; Vitamin K2; Vitamin K3; Proteine din zer; Drojdie; Zinc; Altele